Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-145
National Guard; officers; resignations; acceptance; limitations.

Resignations of all commissioned officers and warrant officers will be forwarded to the Adjutant General, through their immediate commanding officers, for the action of the Governor, who may accept and grant an honorable discharge; Provided, the officer shall not be honorably discharged until he has satisfactorily accounted for all property he may be responsible for, nor while under charges for the commission of any offense.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 47, p. 381;

R.S.1913, § 3946;

C.S.1922, § 3345;

C.S.1929, § 55-172;

R.S.1943, § 55-124;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 43, p. 1595.